California, session 20252026, AB2586.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4495 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4495. In coordination with local air pollution control and air quality management districts, the department and the State Air Resources Board shall develop and fund a program, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to enhance air quality and smoke monitoring, and to provide a public awareness campaign regarding prescribed burns. The program may include, but need not be limited to, purchasing new, rapidly deployable air quality monitors. The program shall include adequate funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for local air pollution control and air quality management district participation and implementation costs.